North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-43 Meatpacking Plant Assistance [Repealed]

4-43-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 80, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-43-02.
Powers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 80, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-43-03.
Bank of North Dakota. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 80, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-43-04.
Issuance and sale of bonds — Use of bond proceeds. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 80, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-43-05.
Agreement with bondholders. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 80, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-43-06.
Reserve fund. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 80, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-43-07.
Exemption from state and local taxes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 80, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-43-08.
Payment of bonds. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 80, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-43-09.
Legal investments. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 80, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-43-10.
Validity. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 80, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.